Colorado, session 2026A, HB1068.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-303, amend
(2)(h)(I)(A) and (2)(h)(II) as follows:
2-3-303. Functions - report - definitions - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2) In addition to any other powers and duties set forth in law, the
executive committee of the legislative council has the following powers and
duties:
(h) (I) The power to allow members of the general assembly to
participate electronically in legislative proceedings and to recommend,
develop, and establish policies regarding electronic participation if so
allowed; except that, if allowed, electronic participation must only be
allowed for:
(A) Committee meetings occurring during the legislative interim OR
OTHER MEETINGS OF A COMMITTEE COMPRISED OF MEMBERS FROM BOTH
CHAMBERS CONVENED AT ANY TIME DURING THE YEAR. THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(h)(I)(A) DOES NOT APPLY TO A JOINT MEETING OF ONE OR MORE HOUSE
COMMITTEES OF REFERENCE AND ONE OR MORE SENATE COMMITTEES OF
REFERENCE; or
(II) A member participating electronically in a committee meeting
OCCURRING DURING THE LEGISLATIVE INTERIM pursuant to subsection
(2)(h)(I)(A) of this section is deemed to be in attendance of that committee
for the purpose of receiving compensation to which the member is entitled
under section 2-2-307 (3). Notwithstanding section 2-2-307 (3)(b), members
participating electronically IN INTERIM COMMITTEE MEETINGS are not
entitled to reimbursement for any expenses incurred in connection with such
electronic participation.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1068

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1068